examples/pdnm/german-nstd-hyph/nstd-hyph-de-1901.pat.txt
ac1kar
ac3ken
ac3ker
brüc3ke
c1ka.
c1ke
c3ker.
c3kere
c3kern
c1ki
c1ku
drüc3ke
ec1ka
ec1ko
hnec3
hrüc3ke
ic3ken
ic3ki
ic1ky
i2k
2kac
2kada
2kadr
1kag
2kal
2kan
2kau
2keff
2kehe
2kei
2kemp
4kense
2kent
4kente.
4kenten
3kerc
4kergeb
4kerhö
4kerlau
4kerleb
2kero
2kerr
2kerz.
2kese
2kex
2kid
2kim
2kind
2kop
2kum
2kunt
2kup
lüc3ke
oc1ka
oc2kar
oc3ken
rec2ka
rec3ken
tüc3ke
tüc6kers
uc3ker
üc2ker
wic3ka
xtbloc4
